Louisiana, session 2026, HB918.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2255.1 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:2255.2
through 2255.7 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2255.1. Definitions
* * *
(3) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(4) "Manufacturer" means any entity which is engaged in the production,
preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of prescription
drugs, whether directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin,
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and
chemical synthesis, or any entity engaged in the packaging, repackaging, labeling,
relabeling, or distribution of prescription drugs. The term shall not include a
wholesale distributor of prescription drugs licensed pursuant to the Louisiana Drug
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-933 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 918
and Device Distributors Act, R.S. 37:3461 et seq., a retailer, or a pharmacist licensed
pursuant to the Louisiana Pharmacy Practice Act, R.S. 37:1161 et seq.
(5) "Wholesale acquisition cost" means the wholesale price charged on a
specific prescription drug that is assigned by the drug manufacturer and listed in a
nationally recognized drug pricing file.
§2255.2. Critical prescription drug list
A. The department shall develop a list of critical prescription drugs made
available in Louisiana for which there is a substantial public interest in
understanding the development of pricing for the drugs.
B. In developing the list required by Subsection A of this Section, the
department shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following factors:
(1) The cost of the drug to public healthcare programs including but not
limited to Medicaid.
(2) The current cost of the drug in the state.
(3) The extent of use of the drug within the state.
(4) The availability and cost of comparable or therapeutically equivalent
courses of treatment.
(5) The rate at which the drug is deemed to produce successful outcomes
when used to treat the conditions for which it is most commonly prescribed.
(6) Any other objectively quantifiable factors as the committee determines
to be relevant to evaluating the significance of the availability of the drug in
Louisiana.
C. The department may also consider recommendations for drugs to be
included in the list submitted by government agencies, members of the public, and
professional organizations representing the pharmaceutical industry, healthcare
practitioners, pharmaceutical manufacturers, managed care plans, prescription drug
benefit managers, and other insurers.
D. The list developed pursuant to this Section shall be reviewed and updated
by the department at least once every three years.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-933 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 918
§2255.3. Manufacturer reporting
For each prescription drug that the department places on the critical
prescription drug list pursuant to R.S. 40:2255.12, the department shall require the
manufacturer of the drug to report the following information to the department:
(1) Total cost of production and approximate cost of production per dose.
(2) Research and development costs of the drug including but not limited to
all of the following:
(a) Research and development costs that are paid with public funds.
(b) After-tax research and development costs paid by the manufacturer.
(c) Research and development costs paid by third parties.
(3) Marketing and advertising costs for the drug, apportioned by marketing
activities that are directed to consumers, marketing activities that are directed to
prescribers, and the total cost of all marketing and advertising that is directed
primarily to Louisiana consumers and prescribers.
(4) The prices for the drug that are charged to purchasers outside the United
States, by country, for a representative set of countries determined by the
department.
(5) Prices charged to typical Louisiana purchasers including but not limited
to all of the following:
(a) Pharmacies.
(b) Pharmacy chains.
(c) Pharmacy wholesalers.
(d) Other direct purchasers.
§2255.4. Rulemaking; enforcement
A. The secretary of the department shall adopt any rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this Subpart.
B. The failure of a manufacturer to provide the information required by this
Subpart shall constitute a prohibited practice under the Unfair Trade Practices and
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-933 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 918
Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq., and shall be subject to the
enforcement provisions of that Chapter.
§2255.15. Confidentiality
A. Information reported to the department pursuant to R.S. 40:2255.3 shall
not be deemed to be a public or government record. The information shall be kept
confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure.
B. Any public reporting of information submitted pursuant to R.S. 40:2255.3
shall be aggregated to protect the financial, competitive, or proprietary nature of the
information.
§2255.6. Report to the legislature
A.(1) The department shall prepare an annual report on prescription drug
prices and their role in overall healthcare spending in the state based on the data
submitted to the department pursuant to R.S. 40:2255.3 and in accordance with R.S.
40:2255.15.
(2) The department shall identify and include in the report a list of those
prescription drugs that have a cost in Louisiana that is excessively high when
compared with the cost of the drug in other states and countries and when compared
with the overall cost of researching, developing, and producing the drug in light of
the number of years the drug has been made available for distribution.
(3) The department may include in the report recommendations for actions
to lower prescription drug costs and spending across the state while maintaining
access to and the quality of health care.
B. The department shall submit the report to the House and Senate
committees on health and welfare no later than sixty days prior to the start of the
regular legislative session. The department shall also make the report publicly
available on the website of the Louisiana Department of Health.
§2255.7. Disclosure of prescription drug price information; educational or
marketing materials; minimum content; violations
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-933 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 918
A. Any person engaging in any form of prescription drug marketing directly
to a healthcare provider with the intent that the provider may prescribe the drug for
use by his patients shall include price information in the materials.
B. The price information required by Subsection A of this Section shall
include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) The date that the educational or marketing materials were prepared.
(2) The name of the drug and of the current manufacturer.
(3)(a) The average wholesale acquisition cost of a thirty day supply of the
drug described in the materials as of the date the educational or marketing materials
were prepared.
(b) If the described drug is designed to be administered for a duration of
therapy of less than thirty days, the proposed duration and wholesale acquisition cost
for that period of time as of the date the educational or marketing materials were
prepared.
(c) The disclosure of the wholesale acquisition cost shall account for each
labeled indication and reflect any differences as a result of different strengths and
dosage forms approved for sale.
(4) The date that the drug was first marketed in the United States and the
wholesale acquisition cost as of that date.
(5) The wholesale acquisition cost on each date that the price of the drug has
changed since the drug was first marketed in the United States.
C.(1) The disclosures required by this Section shall be made on a form and
in a manner prescribed by the Louisiana Department of Health.
(2) The completed form shall be provided to the healthcare provider at the
same time and in the same manner as any other marketing materials provided to the
provider. If the marketing activities are performed telephonically, then the form
shall be sent to the healthcare provider by mail or electronically within one business
day of the marketing activity.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-933 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 918
D. A violation of any provision of this Section shall constitute a prohibited
practice under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S.
51:1401 et seq., and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions of that Chapter.
E. The Louisiana Department of Health shall adopt, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., any rules and regulations
necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(27) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(27) R.S. 40:3.1, 31.14, 31.27, 39.1, 41, 73, 95, 96, 526, 528, 973.1, 978.2.1,
1007, 1061.21, 1079.18, 1081.10, 1105.6, 1105.8, 1125.14, 1133.8, 1168.3, 1171.4,
1203.4, 1231.4, 1379.1.1(D), 1379.3, 2009.8, 2009.14, 2010.5, 2017.9, 2018, 2018.5,
2019, 2020, 2106, 2109.1, 2138, 2175.7(B)(1), 2193.6, 2255.15, 2532, 2845.1.
* * *